espeak-ng-1.52.0/dictsource/xex_rules
///base rules specify transcription for eSpeak interpretation
///dictrules 2 is for mbrola br4 compatibility 

.L01 b d g v z q //xuázin tolson
.L02 ' -
.L03 f v s z x q 
.L04 po lu qe qa qo ze zo
.L09 á é í ó ú ý //"fiklé", "gexló"

.replace
	ä	ã
	ẽ	ë
	ï	ĩ
	ö	õ
	ü	ũ

.group a
	_)a	_!%a:
	@)a	%a
	_C)a(_	%a
	_C)a(CA	%a
	_C)a(CCL09	%a
	C)a(L02A	%a_!
	_C)a(C_	'a:
	_C)a(C	'a:
	_CC)a	'a:
	a)a	:
	_C)a(a	'!a:

	_)ai	_!%aI:
	ai	%aI:

	_)au	_!%aU:
	au	%aU:

.group á
	_)á	_!'a:
	_)á(CL09	_!'a
	_)á(CCL09	_!'a
	_)á(CCCL09	_!'a
	á	'a:
	á(CL09	'a
	á(CCL09	'a
	á(CCCL09	'a

	_)ái	_!'aI:
	_)ái(CL09	_!'aI
	_)ái(CCL09	_!'aI
	_)ái(CCCL09	_!'aI	
	ái	'aI:
	ái(CL09	'aI
	ái(CCL09	'aI
	ái(CCCL09	'aI

	_)áu	_!'aU:
	_)áu(CL09	_!'aU
	_)áu(CCL09	_!'aU
	_)áu(CCCL09	_!'aU	
	áu	'aU:
	áu(CL09	'aU
	áu(CCL09	'aU
	áu(CCCL09	'aU

.group à
	_)à	_!%a:
	à	%a:

	_)ài	_!%aI:
	ài	%aI:

	_)àu	_!%aU:
	àu	%aU:

.group ã

	_)ã	_!%&~:
	ã	%&~:

	_)ãu	_!%&U~:
	ãu	%&U~:

	_)ãi	_!%&~:j
	ãi	%&~:j
?2	_)ãi	_!%@:%%i~
?2	ãi	%@:%%i~

.group â

	_)â	_!'&~:
	â	'&~:

	_)âu	_!'&U~:
	âu	'&U~:

	_)âi	_!'&~:j
	âi	'&~:j
?2	_)âi	_!'@:%%i~
?2	âi	'@:%%i~

.group ā
	_)ā	_!'a:_
	_)āI	_!'aI:_	
	_)āu	_!'aU:_
	ā	'a:_
	āI	'aI:_	
	āu	'aU:_
	
.group b
	b	b
	bb	b:
?2	bb	_!b

.group d
	d	d
	dd	d:
?2	dd	_!d
?5	dq	d|Z
	dq	dZ
	d(qC	d
	ddq	dZ:
?2	ddz	_!dz
?5	ddq	_!d|Z
?2 ?!5	ddq	_!dZ

.group e
	_)e	_!%E:
	@)e	%E
	_C)e(_	%E
	_C)e(CA	%E
	_C)e(CCL09	%E
	C)e(L02A	%E_!
	_C)e(C_	'E:
	_C)e(C	'E:	
	_CC)e	'E:
	e)e	:
	_C)e(e	'!E:

	_)ei	_!%eI:
	ei	%eI:

	_)eu	_!%eU:
	eu	%eU:

.group é
	_)é	_!'E:
	_)é(CL09	_!'E
	_)é(CCL09	_!'E
	_)é(CCCL09	_!'E
	é	'E:
	é(CL09	'E
	é(CCL09	'E
	é(CCCL09	'E

	_)éi	_!'eI:
	_)éi(CL09	_!'eI
	_)éi(CCL09	_!'eI
	_)éi(CCCL09	_!'eI
	éi	'eI:
	éi(CL09	'eI
	éi(CCL09	'eI
	éi(CCCL09	'eI

	_)éu	_!'eU:
	_)éu(CL09	_!'eU
	_)éu(CCL09	_!'eU
	_)éu(CCCL09	_!'eU	
	éu	'eU:
	éu(CL09	'eU
	éu(CCL09	'eU
	éu(CCCL09	'eU

.group è
	_)è	_!%E:
	è	%E:

	_)èi	_!%eI:
	èi	%eI:

	_)èu	_!%eU:
	èu	%eU:

.group ë

	_)ë	_!%e~:
	ë	%e~:
?3	k)ë	_|%e~:

	_)ëi	_!%e~:j
	ëi	%e~:j
?2	_)ëi	_!%e~%%i~
?2	ëi	%e~%%i~
?3	k)ëi	_|%e~%%i~

	_)ëu	_!%e~:w
	ëu	%e~:w
?2	_)ëu	_!%e~%%u~
?2	ëu	%e~%%u~
?3	k)ëu	_|%e~%%u~

.group ê

	_)ê	_'e~:
	ê	'e~:
?2	k)ê	_|'e~:

	_)êi	_'e~:j
	êi	'e~:j
?2	_)êi	_'e~%%i~
?2	êi	'e~%%i~
?2	k)êi	_|'e~%%i~

	_)êu	_'e~:w
	êu	'e~:w
?2	_)êu	_|'e~%%u~
?2	êu	'e~%%u~
?2	k)êu	_|'e~%%u~

.group ē

	_)ē	_!'E:_
	_)ēi	_!'eI:_
	_)ēu	_!'eU:_	
	ē	'E:_
	ēi	'eI:_
	ēu	'eU:_		

.group f
	f	f
?2	f(L03	f_!


.group g
	g	g
	gg	g:
?2	gg	_!g

.group h
	h	h

.group i
	_)i	_;_%i:
	_L04_)i(_	_!%i:
	@)i	%i
	_C)i(_	%i
	_C)i(CA	%i
	_C)i(CCL09	%i
	C)i(L02A	%i_!
	_C)i(C_	'i:
	_C)i(C	'i:
	_CC)i	'i:
	i)i	:
	_C)i(i	'!i:

	ia	j%a
	iá	j'a:
	iá(CL09	j'a
	iá(CCL09	j'a
	iá(CCCL09	j'a
	ià	j%a
	iã	j%&~:
	iâ	j'&~:
	iā	j'a:_

	ie	j%E
	ié	j'E:
	ié(CL09	j'E
	ié(CCL09	j'E
	ié(CCCL09	j'E
	iè	j%E
	iẽ	j%e~:
	iê	j'e~:
	iē	j'E:_	

	io	j%o
	ió	j'o:
	ió(CL09	j'o
	ió(CCL09	j'o
	ió(CCCL09	j'o
	iò	j%o
	iõ	j%o~:
	iô	j'o~:
	iō	j'o:_

	iu	j%u
	iú	j'u:
	iú(CL09	j'u
	iú(CCL09	j'u
	iú(CCCL09	j'u
	iù	j%u
	iũ	j%u~:
	iû	j'u~:
	iū	j'u:_

.group í
	_)í	_!'i:
	_)í(CL09	_!'i
	_)í(CCL09	_!'i
	_)í(CCCL09	_!'i	
	í	'i:
	í(CL09	'i
	í(CCL09	'i
	í(CCCL09	'i

.group ì
	_)ì	_!%i:
	ì	%i:

.group ĩ
	_)ĩ	_!%i~:
	ĩ	%i~:

.group î
	_)î	_!'i~:
	î	'i~:
	
.group ī

	_)ī	_!'i:_
	ī	'i:_

.group j
	j	j
?2	C_)j	_|j
	_)ja	_;_j%a:
	_)je	_;_j%E:
	_)ji	_;_j%i:
	_)jo	_;_j%o:
	_)ju	_;_j%u:
	
	_L04_)ja	j%a:
	_L04_)je	j%E:
	_L04_)ji	j%i:
	_L04_)jo	j%o:
	_L04_)ju	j%u:

.group k
	k	k
	kk	k:
	kg	g:
	k(L01	g

.group l
	l	l
	ll	l:
?3	ll	l^

.group m
	m	m
?2	_)m	_!m

.group n
	n	n
	nn	n:
	n(g	N
	n(k	N
	n(b	m
	n(p	m

.group o
	_)o	_!%o:
	@)o	%o
	_C)o(_	%o
	_C)o(CA	%o
	_C)o(CCL09	%o
	C)o(L02A	%o_!
	_C)o(C_	'o:
	_C)o(C	'o:
	_CC)o	'o:
	o)o	:
	_C)o(o	'!o:

	_)oi	_!%oI:
	oi	%oI:

	_)ou	_!%o:w
	ou	%o:w

.group ó
	_)ó	_!'o:
	_)ó(CL09	_!'o
	_)ó(CCL09	_!'o
	_)ó(CCCL09	_!'o
	ó	'o:
	ó(CL09	'o
	ó(CCL09	'o
	ó(CCCL09	'o

	_)ói	_!'oI:	
	_)ói(CL09	_!'oI
	_)ói(CCL09	_!'oI
	_)ói(CCCL09	_!'oI
	ói	'oI:
	ói(CL09	'oI
	ói(CCL09	'oI
	ói(CCCL09	'oI

	_)óu	_!'o:w
	_)óu(CL09	_!'ow
	_)óu(CCL09	_!'ow
	_)óu(CCCL09	_!'ow	
	óu	'o:w
	óu(CL09	'ow
	óu(CCL09	'ow
	óu(CCCL09	'ow

.group ò
	_)ò	_!%o:
	ò	%o:

	_)òi	_!%oI:
	òi	%oI:

	_)òu	_!%o:w
	òu	%o:w

.group õ

	_)õ	_!%o~:
	õ	%o~:

	_)õi	_!%o~:j
	õi	%o~:j
?2	_)õi	_!%o~:%%i~
?2	õi	%o~:%%i~

	_)õu	_!%o~:w
	õu	%o~:w
?2	_)õu	_!%o~%%u~
?2	õu	%o~%%u~

.group ô

	_)ô	_!'o~:
	ô	'o~:

	_)ôi	_!'o~:j
	ôi	'o~:j
?2	_)ôi	_!'o~:%%i~
?2	ôi	'o~:%%i~

	_)ôu	_!'o~:w
	ôu	'o~:w
?2	_)ôu	_!'o~%%u~
?2	ôu	'o~%%u~

.group ō

	_)ō	_!'o:_
	_)ōi	_!'oI:_
	_)ōu	_!'o:w_	
	ō	'o:_
	ōi	'oI:_
	ōu	'o:w_		

.group p
	p	p
	pp	p:
	pb	b:
	p(L01	b

.group q
	q	Z
?2	q(L03	Z_!

.group r
	r	R
?2	r	*
?2	r(C	r/

.group s
	s	s
?2	s(L03	s_!

.group t
	t	t
	tt	t:
	td	d:
?2	td	_!d
	t(L01	d
?5	tx	t|S	
	tx	tS
?5	tq	d|Z	
	tq	dZ
	t(xC	t
	t(qC	d
?5	ttx	t:S	
	ttx	tS:
	tdq	dZ:
?2	tdz	_!dz
?2 ?!5	tdq	_!dZ
?5	tdq	_!d|Z

.group u
	_)u	_!%u:
	@)u	%u
	_C)u(_	%u
	_C)u(CA	%u
	_C)u(CCL09	%u
	C)u(L02A	%u_!
	_C)u(C_	'u:
	_C)u(C	'u:
	_CC)u	'u:
	u)u	:
	_C)u(u	'!u:

	ua	w%a
	ue	w%E
	ui	w%i
	uo	w%o

	uá	w'a:
	uá(CL09	w'a
	uá(CCL09	w'a
	uá(CCCL09	w'a
	ué	w'E:
	ué(CL09	w'E
	ué(CCL09	w'E
	ué(CCCL09	w'E
	uí	w'i:
	uí(CL09	w'i
	uí(CCL09	w'i
	uí(CCCL09	w'i
	uó	w'o:
	uó(CL09	w'o
	uó(CCL09	w'o
	uó(CCCL09	w'o

	uà	w%a
	uè	w%E
	uì	w%i
	uò	w%o

	uã	w%&~:
	uẽ	w%e~:
	uĩ	w%i~:
	uõ	w%o~:

	uâ	w'&~:
	uê	w'e~:
	uî	w'i~:
	uô	w'o~:
	
	uā	w'a:_
	uē	w'E:_
	uī	w'i:_
	uō	w'o:_

.group ú
	_)ú	_!'u:
	ú	'u:
	ú(CL09	'u
	ú(CCL09	'u
	ú(CCCL09	'u

.group ù
	_)ù	_!%u:
	ù	%u

.group ũ

	_)ũ	_!%u~:
	ũ	%u~:

.group û

	_)û	_!'u~:
	û	'u~:

.group ū

	_)ū	_!'u:_
	ū	'u:_

.group v
	v	v
?2	v(L03	v_!

.group w
	w	w
?2	_)w	_|w

.group x
	x	S
?2	x(L03	S_!

.group y
	_)y	_!%@
	y	%@
	_)y(_	_!%@:_:

.group ý
	_)ý	_!'@:
	ý	'@:
	&)ý	'@

.group z
	z	z
?2	z(L03	z_!

.group
	.	_;_
	...	_;_
	~	_:#X1_:
	"	_:#X1_:
	A)'	_!
	C)'	_!
	'	
